Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.275

Limitations on liability for dispensing of prescription.

(1) A pharmacist who dispenses a prescription product in the form manufactured by a commercial manufacturer pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed practitioner is not liable to a person who was injured through the use of the product, based on a claim of the following:

(a) Strict liability in tort; or

(b) Implied warranty provisions under the uniform commercial code Title 62A RCW.

(2) The limitation on pharmacist's liability as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall only apply if the pharmacist complies with recordkeeping requirements pursuant to chapters 18.64, 69.41, and 69.50 RCW, and related administrative rules.

(3) A pharmacist who dispenses a prescription product in the form manufactured by a commercial manufacturer issued by a licensed practitioner is liable to the claimant only if the claimant's harm was proximately caused by (a) the negligence of the pharmacist; (b) breach of an express warranty made by the pharmacist; or (c) the intentional misrepresentation of facts about the product by the pharmacist or the intentional concealment of information about the product by the pharmacist. A pharmacist shall not be liable for the product manufacturer's liability except as provided in RCW 7.72.040.

[ 1991 c 189 s 1.]